Hawaii statutes.
§712-1275 Order of abatement.
If the existence of a nuisance is established in a suit as provided herein, an
order of abatement shall be entered as a part of the judgment in the case,
which order shall include a provision permanently prohibiting the person or
persons causing, maintaining, aiding, abetting, or permitting the nuisance, if
said person or persons are a party to the proceeding, from residing in or
entering into the building, premises, or place in or upon which the nuisance
exists. The court, on the application of the person, may suspend the
prohibition if the person is participating in a court-approved treatment and
monitoring program which addresses the person's conduct which caused the
nuisance. If the court determines that the person has successfully completed
the program and that the person is not likely to again create a nuisance, the
court may dissolve the injunction against the person. In the event that the
court determines that an injunction against the person or persons causing, maintaining,
aiding, abetting, or permitting the nuisance will not completely abate the
nuisance or that one or more of the persons causing, maintaining, aiding,
abetting, or permitting the nuisance are not parties to the proceeding, the
court shall also direct the effectual closing of the building, premises, or
place, against its use for any purpose, and that it be kept closed for a period
not exceeding one year, unless sooner released, as provided by section
712-1277. While the order remains in effect as to closing, the building,
premises, or place shall remain in the custody of the court. The court's
orders may also include, but are not limited to, an order suspending or
revoking any business, professional, operational, or liquor license. [L 1979, c
181, pt of §2; am L 1996, c 246, §6; am L 2005, c 123, §6]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next